Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-213 Credits for assessments paid.
(a) A member insurer may offset against its premium tax liability (or
liabilities) to this State an assessment described in section 431:16-209(h) to
the extent of twenty per cent of the amount of such assessment for each of the
five calendar years following the year in which such assessment was paid. In
the event a member insurer should cease doing business, all uncredited
assessments may be credited against its premium tax liability (or liabilities)
for the year it ceases doing business.

(b) Any sums which are acquired by refund,
pursuant to section 431:16-209(f), from the association by member insurers, and
which have theretofore been offset against premium taxes as provided in
subsection (a) shall be paid by the association to the commissioner and by the
commissioner deposited with the state director of finance for credit to the
general fund of this State. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next